Utah statutes.
62A-2-117.   Licensure of tribal foster homes.

(1)  The Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901-1963, provides that Indian tribes may develop and implement tribal foster home standards.

(2)  The office shall give full faith and credit to an Indian tribe’s certification or licensure of tribal foster homes according to standards developed and approved by the Indian tribe, pursuant to the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C.  Secs. 1901-1963.

(3)  If the Indian tribe has not developed standards, the office shall license tribal foster homes pursuant to this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2005 General Session

